Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1235
Department; accept gifts.

The department may accept from any person, in the name of and for the state, services, equipment, supplies, materials, or funds by way of bequest, gift, or grant for the purposes of promoting emergency medical care. Any such funds received shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Health and Human Services Cash Fund.

Laws 1997, LB 138, § 26;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-5197;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 604;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 519.